Wyoming, session 2026, SF0075.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 2-2-401(a)(iii), 5-2-120 by creating
a new subsection (e), 5-2-202, 5-3-206(a)(i), (vii) and
(x), 5-6-108(a)(i), 5-9-135, 5-13-202, 6-10-102 and
6-10-103 are amended to read:

2-2-401. Schedule; additional charges.
SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381

(a) For probate matters filed or commenced, the clerk
of the district court shall collect fees as follows:

(iii) In addition to the original filing fee
under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection, a court
automation fee in the amount of forty dollars ($40.00)
determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e), which shall be deposited
into the judicial systems automation account established by
W.S. 5-2-120;

5-2-120. Judicial systems automation account created;
purposes; court information technology equipment;
establishment of court automation fees.

(e) The supreme court shall promulgate rules to
establish the amount of the court automation fee required
to be collected under law, in accordance with all of the
following:

(i) Fees shall be set at an amount necessary to
ensure that, to the greatest extent practicable, the total
revenue generated from the court automation fees collected
SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
is sufficient to address but does not exceed the direct and
indirect costs for items specified in subsection (a) of
this section;

(ii) Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this
subsection, the supreme court may establish a separate
court automation fee for chancery courts under W.S.
5-13-202;

(iii) The supreme court shall maintain records
sufficient to demonstrate that the amount of the court
automation fees established under this subsection comply
with the requirements of this subsection;

(iv) Not later than October 1 of each year, the
supreme court shall report to the joint judiciary interim
committee and the joint appropriations committee on the
amount of the court automation fee established under this
subsection and the total amount of court automation fees
collected in the immediately preceding fiscal year.

5-2-202. Collection of fees.

SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
The clerk of the supreme court shall collect the following
fees from the plaintiff in error or appellant, or in case
of an original proceeding the plaintiff or relator shall,
at the time of filing the petition in error or record on
appeal or when commencing the cause in this court, the sum
of seventy-five dollars ($75.00). At the time of filing,
the clerk also shall collect a court automation fee in the
amount of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) determined under W.S.
5-2-120(e), which shall be deposited into the judicial
systems automation account established by W.S. 5-2-120, and
an indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten
dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited into the indigent
civil legal services account established by W.S. 5-2-121.
Other fees or charges to be assessed within the clerk's
office are to be determined under rules of the supreme
court.

5-3-206. Fees.

(a) For all civil matters filed or commenced, the
clerk of each district court shall charge the following
fees:

SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
(i) For filing instruments or documents in each
civil action and certifying one (1) copy of any order,
decree or judgment at the time of its filing for each
party, an original filing fee of one hundred sixty dollars
($160.00) one hundred twenty dollars ($120.00), plus a
court automation fee in the amount determined under W.S.
5-2-120(e), which shall be paid by the plaintiff. This fee
shall apply to original actions commenced and to actions
that are reopened after a final decree previously has been
entered. Forty dollars ($40.00) The amount of the filing
court automation fee determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e) shall
be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) of the filing
fee shall be for indigent civil legal services and both
shall be remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205;

(vii) For all transcripts in cases appealed to
the supreme court, one hundred dollars ($100.00) sixty
dollars ($60.00), plus a court automation fee in the amount
determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e), including certificates,
seals and transmission. Forty dollars ($40.00) The court
automation fee under this paragraph determined under W.S.
5-2-120(e) shall be for court automation, ten dollars
($10.00) of the transcript fee shall be for indigent civil
SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
legal services and both shall be remitted as provided in
W.S. 5-3-205;

(x) For docketing and in payment of clerk's fee
after docketing incident to any appeal or bill of exception
from a circuit court, one hundred dollars ($100.00) sixty
dollars ($60.00), plus a court automation fee in the amount
determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e), and for docketing any
transcript of judgment from a circuit court upon the
judgment and execution dockets, one hundred dollars
($100.00) sixty dollars ($60.00), plus a court automation
fee in the amount determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e), which
amount shall be paid by appellant, or by judgment holder to
the clerk at time of docketing. Forty dollars ($40.00) The
amount of any court automation fee imposed under this
paragraph shall be for court automation, ten dollars
($10.00) of the filing fee shall be for indigent civil
legal services and both shall be remitted as provided in
W.S. 5-3-205.

5-6-108. Costs.

SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
(a) Each city or town in the state of Wyoming may
prescribe by ordinance such costs in all trials before
municipal courts as may be necessary or deemed expedient.
However, the costs shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00).
All costs collected shall be turned into the treasury of
the city or town. By ordinance a city or town may
prescribe:

(i) A court automation fee of forty dollars
($40.00) in the amount determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e) as
a cost to be paid by every person guilty of a violation of
a city or town ordinance;

5-9-135. Filing fee.

For all civil matters, the circuit court shall collect from
the plaintiff an original filing fee of twenty dollars
($20.00), a court automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00),
in the amount determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e) and an
indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00)
excluding small claims civil actions as provided in W.S.
1-21-201 through 1-21-205, which shall have a filing fee of
ten dollars ($10.00). The court automation fee shall be
SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
deposited into the judicial systems automation account and
the indigent civil legal services fee shall be deposited
into the indigent civil legal services account as provided
by W.S. 5-9-144.

5-13-202. Collection of fees.

The clerk of the chancery court shall collect all fees and
charges as required and set by the supreme court under W.S.
5-13-104(b). At the time of the original filing, the clerk
also shall collect a court automation fee in the amount of
one hundred dollars ($100.00) determined under W.S.
5-2-120(e) or (e)(ii), which shall be deposited into the
judicial systems automation account established by W.S.
5-2-120, and an indigent civil legal services fee in the
amount of ten dollars ($10.00), which shall be deposited
into the indigent civil legal services account established
by W.S. 5-2-121.

6-10-102. Imposition of fine for any felony; maximum
fine where not established by statute; court automation
fee; indigent civil legal services fee.

SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
The court may impose a fine as part of the punishment for
any felony. If the statute does not establish a maximum
fine, the fine shall be not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000.00). The court shall impose a court automation fee
of forty dollars ($40.00) in the amount determined under
W.S. 5-2-120(e) in every criminal case wherein the
defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no
contest or is placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301. The
fee shall be remitted as provided by W.S. 5-3-205. In
addition to the court automation fee the court shall impose
an indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars
($10.00) in every criminal case wherein the defendant is
found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no contest or is
placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301 or 35-7-1037. The
indigent civil legal services fee shall be remitted as
provided in W.S. 5-3-205(a)(ii).

6-10-103. Penalties for misdemeanors where not
prescribed by statute; court automation fee; indigent civil
legal services fee.

Unless a different penalty is prescribed by law, every
crime declared to be a misdemeanor is punishable by
SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both. The court shall impose a court
automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00) in the amount
determined under W.S. 5-2-120(e) in every criminal case
wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of
guilty or no contest or is placed on probation under W.S.
7-13-301. The fee shall be remitted as provided by W.S.
5-3-205. In addition to the court automation fee the court
shall impose an indigent civil legal services fee of ten
dollars ($10.00) in every criminal case wherein the
defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no
contest or is placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301. The
indigent civil legal services fee shall be remitted as
provided in W.S. 5-3-205(a)(ii).

Section 2. This act shall apply to all new cases,
matters, proceedings and filings initially filed on and
after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. The supreme court may take any action
necessary to implement this act.

SF0075

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0381
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0075